Illinois, session 104th, HB828.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Revenue Act is amended by 5changing Section 14a as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 620/14a)  (from Ch. 120, par. 481a)7    Sec. 14a. This Act may be cited as the the Public Utilities 8Revenue Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-1475.)